Florida, session 2026, HB1047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares that the
provision of quality and cost-efficient medical care is a public
necessity and this act serves a public purpose. The Legislature
further finds and declares that collaborations of special
districts that operate as hospital districts under this act
benefit the residents of this state by improving access to
health care services, strengthening the integration of health
care service providers, and promoting the continuity of care
provided to the residents of the state, and that such
relationships and collaborations are vitally important to and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1047-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1047 2026
necessary for the preservation of the public health and welfare
of such districts, the inhabitants thereof, and the residents of
this state.
Section 2. Subsection (7) is added to section 189.081,
Florida Statutes, to read:
189.081 Activities of special districts; local government
comprehensive planning.—
(7)(a) Two or more special districts that operate as
hospital districts may jointly enter into, participate in,
establish, and control any venture, partnership, corporation,
business entity, organization, joint operating network, service
line, facility, or any other joint relationship or
collaboration, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit,
anywhere within the boundaries of either or all such special
districts.
(b) Parties that jointly enter into or participate in
joint relationships or collaborations with special districts
pursuant to paragraph (a) have state action immunity under the
laws and Constitution of the State of Florida and may exercise
the powers granted in paragraph (a), regardless of the purposes
or effect of such relationships or collaborations, or that the
exercise thereof may otherwise be deemed or considered to be in
violation of state or federal antitrust laws.
(c) This subsection shall supersede and control over any
general or special law that is inconsistent or in conflict with
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1047-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1047 2026
this subsection.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1047-00